FST/hsi/hsi_noun.foma
read lexc morph_hsi_noun.lexc
define morph

source phonetize_hsi_noun.xfst
define phon

define shorten ā -> a || _ "^" PL3,,
	ā -> 0 || _ "^" PL1;

define exceptions PL3 -> y u s || m i r i "^" _,,
	o -> 0 || t ā f f _ "^" PL1,,
	PL1 -> e n || t ā f f "^" _,,
	%+PL -> k ā || v i y ā v "^" _,,
	ā -> e|| g _ r b o "^" PL2,,
	PL1 -> l e n || t ʰ a l "^" _;

define plural PL1 -> y e n || vowel "^" _,,
	PL1 -> e n || consonant consonant "^" _,,
	PL2 -> ā s|| consonant "^" _,,
	PL2 -> ā || vowel "^" _,,
	PL3 -> y u || vowel "^" _,,
	PL3 -> u || consonant "^" _;
define clean "^" -> 0;
define tidy vowel -> 0 || _ ā;

regex morph .o. phon .o. shorten .o. exceptions .o. plural .o. clean .o. tidy;

save stack hsi_noun.a
